Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District.
§ 51-13-129.
Payments by board of supervisors of member counties.

The board of supervisors of each county becoming a member of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District shall pay or cause to be paid to the depository of said district a sum equal to one-half (1/2) mill on all of the taxable property within the Tombigbee Watershed area of the said county, beginning with the tax assessment for the calendar year 1964; and such payments shall be made and continued as long as there remains unpaid and outstanding any bonded indebtedness or obligations created by the district so created under this article. Any such board of supervisors shall provide the district the sum equal to the one-half (1/2) mill levy by appropriation of an equivalent sum from the general fund of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-144; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 14; ch. 225, § 2; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 35, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 51-13-131.
Additional funds.

To provide additional funds for the planning, undertaking, completing and maintenance of any special work or construction project in a county as part of the long range development of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, the respective boards of supervisors may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund which shall be placed in a depository of the district designated for such purpose as a special fund, and shall be used by the district for no other purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-144; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 14; ch. 225, § 2; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 36, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 51-13-133.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be validated as now provided by law of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972. The services of the state’s bond attorney may be employed in the preparation of such bond resolutions, forms or proceedings as may be necessary, for which he shall be paid a reasonable fee. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the chancery court of the county in which the principal office of the district is located, but notice of such validation proceedings shall be published at least two times in a newspaper of general circulation and published in each of the counties comprising the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, the first publication of which in each case shall be made at least ten days preceding the date set for the validation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-145; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-135.
Trust agreement.

At the discretion of the board of directors of the district any bonds provided for in Section 51-13-123 may be further secured by a trust agreement between the board of directors and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the right and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. The trust agreement may contain provision for the issuance of additional bonds for any of the purposes authorized by this article, which shall be secured by the revenues pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein. The trust agreement may include provisions to the effect that if there is any default in the payment of principal or interest on any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the properties and facilities of the district, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities, or commodities of the district or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing said receiver; and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding, or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of said bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the issuance of such bonds and said trust agreement. The fee for the services of any corporate trustee shall not exceed the normal charges for acting as paying agent plus any additional amount or amounts allowed by the court as the reasonable value of services rendered by the corporate trustee upon default in the payment of principal and interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-146; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-137.
Refunding bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the district for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding and issued under authority of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturity and other details thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the board of trustees and of the district in respect to such bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this article, in so far as they are applicable. In no event shall such bonds mature over a period of time exceeding forty years from January 1, 1964.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-147; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-139.
Bonds to be legal investments.

All bonds of the district are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for public funds of counties, cities, towns, school districts, banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and for funds of the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for said deposits to the extent of their value, when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-148; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-141.
Depository for funds of district.

The board of directors shall designate one or more qualified state depositories within the district to serve as depositories for the funds of the district, and all funds of the district other than funds required by any trust agreement to be deposited, from time to time, with the trustee or any paying agent for outstanding bonds of the district, shall be deposited in such depository or depositories.

Before designating a depository or depositories, the board of directors shall issue a notice stating the time and place the board will meet for such purpose and inviting the qualified state depositories in the district to submit applications to be designated depositories. The term of service for depositories shall be prescribed by the board. Such notice shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper or newspapers published in the district and specified by the board.

At the time mentioned in the notice, the board shall consider the applications and the management and condition of the depositories filing them, and shall designate as depositories the qualified state depository or depositories which offer the most favorable terms and conditions for the handling of the funds of the district and which the board finds have proper management and are in condition to warrant handling of district funds, and in the manner as provided under the chapter on depositories. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds. Membership on the board of directors of an officer or director of a depository shall not disqualify such depository from being designated as a depository.

If no applications acceptable to the board are received by the time stated in the notice, the board shall designate some qualified state depository or depositories within the district upon such terms and conditions as it may find advantageous to the district. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-149; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 19; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 13, eff from and after December 1, 1988.

§ 51-13-143.
Agreements relative to federal highways.

The board of directors of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District is hereby authorized and empowered to negotiate and contract with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, concerning all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary for the relocation of any federal road, highway, parkway, or for the facilities appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-150; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-145.
Cooperation with other governmental agencies.

The Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District shall have authority to act jointly with political subdivisions of the state and agencies, commissions, and instrumentalities thereof, and with the federal government and other agencies thereof in the performance of the purposes and services authorized in this article, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the directors.

The board of directors of the district shall have the authority to negotiate and contract with the Secretary of the Army under the provisions of public law 653, 85th Congress, or other applicable law or regulation written pursuant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-151; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-147.
Water management district law controlling.

The provisions of any other law, general, special, or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article. The water management district herein provided for shall not be subject to regulation or control by the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-152; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-149.
District and its bonds exempt from taxation.

The accomplishment of the purposes stated in this article being for the benefit of the people of this state and for the improvement of their properties and industries, the district in carrying out the purposes of this article will be performing an essential public function and shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on the projects and related facilities or any part thereof; and the interest on the bonds issued hereunder shall at all times be free from taxation within this state. The state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds to be issued hereunder that the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its political subdivisions or taxing districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-153; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-151.
Preliminary expenses.

Any municipality or county which is within the territorial limits of the district may advance funds to said district to pay the preliminary expenses, including engineers’ reports, organization, or administration expenses, on such terms of repayment as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine. Notwithstanding the provision of any law to the contrary, any such municipality or county is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed one year from the date of such borrowing, for the purpose of making such advances. The board of directors is hereby authorized to repay any such advances from the proceeds of any funds for bonds issued under the provisions of this article.

Any board of supervisors may, in its discretion, transfer any funds authorized by Sections 51-13-129 and 51-13-131, to the depository of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District to be expended for any of the purposes of the district. The said district is authorized to expend all funds coming into its depository for any legitimate purpose authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-154; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 24; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Dec. 12, 1962).

§ 51-13-153.
Overflow of school lands not to constitute waste.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that the overflow and inundation of sixteenth section lands or in lieu lands shall not constitute legal waste of such lands. The district shall pay a reasonable rental for the use of such lands to be overflowed, to be determined as provided by law in such cases. Any sixteenth section lands that have been flooded shall be reforested before this project shall ever be abandoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-155; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-155.
Savings clause.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to violate any provision of the federal or state constitutions, and all acts done under this article shall be done in such manner as will conform thereto, whether herein expressly provided or not. Where any procedure hereunder may be held by any court to be violative of either of such constitutions, the district shall have the power by resolution to provide any alternative procedure conformable with such constitutions. If any provisions of this article shall be invalid, such fact shall not affect the creation of the district or the validity of any other provision of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-156; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).